Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 8 Outdoor Advertising

§ 16-8-101.
Removal of off-premise outdoor advertising prohibited without compensation; definitions.

No governmental entity, including the state, or any municipality, county or other political subdivision shall remove or cause to be removed any legally placed off-premise outdoor advertising without paying due compensation in cash or other method of payment mutually agreed upon, to the owner of the off-premise outdoor advertising based upon the fair market value of the off-premise outdoor advertising removed or proposed to be removed.

As used in this section:

“Off-premise outdoor advertising” means any outdoor sign, display, light, device, figure, painting, drawing, message, plaque, poster, billboard or other thing which is designed, intended or used to advertise or inform and which is situated in order to be visible from any street, road or highway and which is located on property which is separate from the premise or property on which the advertised activity is carried out;

“Fair market value of the off-premise outdoor advertising” means the value of the off-premise outdoor advertising determined in the same manner as provided by W.S.

1-26-704

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 46, § 1; 1995, ch. 81, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1995, ch. 81, § 2, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to nullify the provisions of W.S.

24-10-101

through

24-10-115

.”